Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3720.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REVIVAL AND REENACTMENT.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes, section 202A.16, subdivisions 1 to 3, are revived and reenacted effective retroactively from July 1, 2023. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end